Hawaii statutes.
§454F-4 License and registration;
application; issuance. (a) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form
as prescribed by NMLS or by the commissioner.

(b) To fulfill the purposes of this chapter,
the commissioner may enter into agreements or contracts with NMLS or other
entities to use NMLS to collect and maintain records and process transaction
fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this
chapter.

(c) For the purpose and the extent necessary
to participate in NMLS, the commissioner may waive or modify, in whole or in
part, by rule or order, any or all of the requirements of this chapter and
establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in NMLS.

(d) In connection with an application for a
license under this chapter, the applicant, at a minimum, shall furnish to NMLS information
concerning the applicant's identity, including:

(1) Fingerprints of the applicant or, if an applicant
is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons, executive
officers, directors, general partners, and managing members for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental agency or entity
authorized to receive the fingerprints for a state, national, and international
criminal history background check; and

(2) Personal history and experience of the applicant or,
if an applicant is not an individual, each of the applicant's control persons,
executive officers, directors, general partners, and managing members in a form
prescribed by NMLS including the submission of authorization for NMLS and the
commissioner to obtain:

(A) An independent credit report obtained
from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit
Reporting Act, title 15 United States Code section 1681 et seq.; and

(B) Information related to any
administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction;

provided that the commissioner may use any
information obtained pursuant to this subsection or through NMLS to determine
an applicant's demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and general
fitness for licensure.

(e) The commissioner may use NMLS as an agent
for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department
of Justice or any governmental agency.

(f) The commissioner may use NMLS as an agent
for requesting and distributing information to and from any source directed by
the commissioner.

(g) An applicant for a license as a mortgage
loan originator company that is a person other than an individual shall be
registered with the business registration division of the department of
commerce and consumer affairs to do business in this State before a license
pursuant to this chapter shall be granted. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L
2010, c 84, §11; am L 2011, c 194, §5; am L 2013, c 168, §§7, 20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next